Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4614
Proceeding for temporary custody order.

(a) After a deploying parent receives notice of deployment and until the deployment terminates, a court may issue a temporary order granting custodial responsibility unless prohibited by the Servicemembers Civil Relief Act, 50 U.S.C. appendix sections 521 and 522, as the act exists on January 1, 2015. A court may not issue a permanent order granting custodial responsibility without the consent of the deploying parent.

(b) At any time after a deploying parent receives notice of deployment, either parent may file a motion regarding custodial responsibility of a child during deployment. The motion must be filed in a pending proceeding for custodial responsibility in a court with jurisdiction under section 43-4604 or, if there is no pending proceeding in a court with jurisdiction under section 43-4604, in a new action for granting custodial responsibility during deployment.

Laws 2015, LB219, § 14.